New York, session 2025-2026, S5167.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 11 of section 120.05 of the penal law, as 2 amended by section 2 of part Z of chapter 55 of the laws of 2024, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 11. With intent to cause physical injury to a train operator, ticket 5 inspector, conductor, signalperson, bus operator, station agent, station 6 cleaner, terminal cleaner, station customer assistant, traffic checker; 7 person whose official duties include the sale or collection of tickets, 8 passes, vouchers, or other revenue payment media for use on a train, 9 bus, or ferry the collection or handling of revenues therefrom; a person 10 whose official duties include the maintenance, repair, inspection, trou- 11 bleshooting, testing or cleaning of buses or ferries, a transit signal 12 system, elevated or underground subway tracks, transit station struc- 13 ture, including fare equipment, escalators, elevators and other equip- 14 ment necessary to passenger service, commuter rail tracks or stations, 15 train yard, revenue train in passenger service, a ferry station, or a 16 train or bus station or terminal; or a supervisor of such personnel, 17 employed by any transit or commuter rail agency, authority or company, 18 public or private, whose operation is authorized by New York state or 19 any of its political subdivisions, a city marshal, a school crossing 20 guard appointed pursuant to section two hundred eight-a of the general 21 municipal law, a traffic enforcement officer, traffic enforcement agent, 22 prosecutor as defined in subdivision thirty-one of section 1.20 of the 23 criminal procedure law, sanitation enforcement agent, New York city EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06038-01-5 S. 5167 2 1 sanitation worker, public health sanitarian, New York city public health 2 sanitarian, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, emergency 3 medical service paramedic, [or] emergency medical service technician, 4 [he or she causes], or a flight crew member or flight attendant of the 5 aircraft, a terminal cleaner, cabin cleaner, facilities cleaner, wheel- 6 chair assist employee, baggage handler, skycap, ticket agent, customer 7 services employee, security guard, queue management employee, shuttle 8 bus driver, or any employee whose duties require them to work on the 9 tarmac, employed by any airport, airport authority or company, public or 10 private, that performs such services at an airport, they cause physical 11 injury to such terminal cleaner, cabin cleaner, facilities cleaner, 12 wheelchair assist employee, baggage handler, skycap, ticket agent, 13 customer services employee, security guard, queue management employee, 14 shuttle bus driver, or any employee whose duties require them to work on 15 the tarmac, while such employee is performing an assigned duty of, or 16 directly related to, such services at an airport in the state of New 17 York, they cause physical injury to such train operator, ticket inspec- 18 tor, conductor, signalperson, bus operator, station agent, station 19 cleaner, terminal cleaner, station customer assistant, traffic checker; 20 person whose official duties include the sale or collection of tickets, 21 passes, vouchers or other revenue payment media for use on a train, bus, 22 or ferry or the collection or handling of revenues therefrom; a person 23 whose official duties include the maintenance, repair, inspection, trou- 24 bleshooting, testing or cleaning of buses or ferries, a transit signal 25 system, elevated or underground subway tracks, transit station struc- 26 ture, including fare equipment, escalators, elevators and other equip- 27 ment necessary to passenger service, commuter rail tracks or stations, 28 train yard, revenue train in passenger service, a ferry station, or a 29 train or bus station or terminal; or a supervisor of such personnel, 30 city marshal, school crossing guard appointed pursuant to section two 31 hundred eight-a of the general municipal law, traffic enforcement offi- 32 cer, traffic enforcement agent, prosecutor as defined in subdivision 33 thirty-one of section 1.20 of the criminal procedure law, registered 34 nurse, licensed practical nurse, public health sanitarian, New York city 35 public health sanitarian, sanitation enforcement agent, New York city 36 sanitation worker, emergency medical service paramedic, or emergency 37 medical service technician, or a flight crew member or flight attendant 38 of the aircraft, a terminal cleaner, cabin cleaner, facilities cleaner, 39 wheelchair assist employee, baggage handler, skycap, ticket agent, 40 customer services employee, security guard, queue management employee, 41 shuttle bus driver, or any employee whose duties require them to work on 42 the tarmac, employed by any airport, airport authority or company, 43 public or private, that performs such services at an airport, they cause 44 physical injury to such terminal cleaner, cabin cleaner, facilities 45 cleaner, wheelchair assist employee, baggage handler, skycap, ticket 46 agent, customer services employee, security guard, queue management 47 employee, shuttle bus driver, or any employee whose duties require them 48 to work on the tarmac, while such employee is performing an assigned 49 duty of, or directly related to, such services at an airport in the 50 state of New York, while such employee is performing an assigned duty 51 on, or directly related to, the operation of a train or bus, cleaning of 52 a train or bus station or terminal, assisting customers, checking traf- 53 fic, the sale or collection of tickets, passes, vouchers, or other 54 revenue media for use on a train, bus, or ferry or maintenance or clean- 55 ing of a train, a bus, a ferry, or bus station or terminal, signal 56 system, elevated or underground subway tracks, transit station struc- S. 5167 3 1 ture, including fare equipment, escalators, elevators and other equip- 2 ment necessary to passenger service, commuter rail tracks or stations, 3 train yard or revenue train in passenger service, a ferry station, or 4 such city marshal, school crossing guard, traffic enforcement officer, 5 traffic enforcement agent, prosecutor as defined in subdivision thirty- 6 one of section 1.20 of the criminal procedure law, registered nurse, 7 licensed practical nurse, public health sanitarian, New York city public 8 health sanitarian, sanitation enforcement agent, New York city sanita- 9 tion worker, emergency medical service paramedic, or emergency medical 10 service technician is performing an assigned duty, or a flight crew 11 member or flight attendant of the aircraft, a terminal cleaner, cabin 12 cleaner, facilities cleaner, wheelchair assist employee, baggage 13 handler, skycap, ticket agent, customer services employee, security 14 guard, queue management employee, shuttle bus driver, or any employee 15 whose duties require them to work on the tarmac, employed by any 16 airport, airport authority or company, public or private, that performs 17 such services at an airport, they cause physical injury to such terminal 18 cleaner, cabin cleaner, facilities cleaner, wheelchair assist employee, 19 baggage handler, skycap, ticket agent, customer services employee, secu- 20 rity guard, queue management employee, shuttle bus driver, or any 21 employee whose duties require them to work on the tarmac, while such 22 employee is performing an assigned duty of, or directly related to, such 23 services at an airport in the state of New York; or 24 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 25 have become a law.